Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-680
Short-time compensation program; weekly
benefit amount; provisions applicable to individuals.

(1) The short-time compensation weekly benefit
amount shall be the product of the regular weekly unemployment compensation
amount for a week of total unemployment multiplied by the percentage of reduction
in the individual's usual weekly hours of work.

(2) An individual
may be eligible for short-time compensation or unemployment compensation,
as appropriate, except that no individual shall be eligible for combined benefits
in any benefit year in an amount more than the maximum entitlement established
for regular unemployment compensation, nor shall an individual be paid short-time
compensation benefits for more than fifty-two weeks under a short-time compensation
plan.

(3) The short-time compensation paid to an individual shall be
deducted from the maximum entitlement amount of unemployment compensation
established for that individual's benefit year.

(4) Provisions applicable
to unemployment compensation claimants shall apply to short-time compensation
claimants to the extent that they are not inconsistent with short-time compensation
provisions. An individual who files an initial claim for short-time compensation
benefits shall receive a monetary determination.

(5) The following provisions
apply to individuals who work for both a short-time compensation employer
and another employer during weeks covered by the approved short-time compensation
plan:

(a) If combined hours of work in a week for both employers does
not result in a reduction of at least ten percent, or, if higher, the minimum
percentage of reduction required to be eligible for a short-time compensation,
of the usual weekly hours of work with the short-time employer, the individual
shall not be entitled to short-time compensation;

(b) If the combined hours
of work for both employers results in a reduction equal to or greater than
ten percent, or, if higher, the minimum percentage reduction required to be
eligible for short-time compensation, of the usual weekly hours of work for
the short-time compensation employer, the short-time compensation payable
to the individual is reduced for that week and is determined by multiplying
the weekly unemployment benefit amount for a week of total unemployment by
the percentage by which the combined hours of work have been reduced by ten
percent, or, if higher, the minimum percentage reduction required to be eligible
for short-time compensation, or more of the individual's usual weekly hours
of work. A week for which benefits are paid under this subdivision shall be
reported as a week of short-time compensation; and

(c) If an individual worked
the reduced percentage of the usual weekly hours of work for the short-time
compensation employer and is available for all his or her usual hours of work
with the short-time compensation employer, and the individual did not work
any hours for the other employer, either because of the lack of work with
that employer or because the individual is excused from work with the other
employer, the individual shall be eligible for short-time compensation for
that week. The benefit amount for such week shall be calculated as provided
in subsection (1) of this section.

(6) An individual who is not provided any
work during a week by the short-time compensation employer, or any other employer,
and who is otherwise eligible for unemployment compensation shall be eligible
for the amount of unemployment compensation to which he or she would otherwise
be eligible.

(7) An individual who is not provided any work by the short-time
compensation employer during a week, but who works for another employer and
is otherwise eligible, may be paid unemployment compensation for that week
subject to the disqualifying income and other provisions applicable to claims
for regular compensation.

Laws 2014, LB961, § 21.